Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-8,137.05
Excellence
in Teaching Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Excellence in Teaching
Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of appropriations by the Legislature,
transfers pursuant to section 9-812, and loan repayments, penalties, and interest
payments received in the course of administering the Attracting Excellence
to Teaching Program and the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program.

(2) For all fiscal years except fiscal
years 2011-12 and 2012-13, the department shall allocate on an
annual basis up to four hundred thousand dollars in the aggregate of the funds
to be distributed for the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program to all
eligible institutions according to the distribution formula as determined
by rule and regulation. The eligible institutions shall act as agents of the
department in the distribution of the funds for the Attracting Excellence
to Teaching Program to eligible students. The remaining available funds shall
be distributed by the department to eligible students for the Enhancing Excellence
in Teaching Program.

(3) For fiscal
years 2011-12 and 2012-13, the department shall allocate on an annual basis
funds to be distributed for the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program
to all eligible institutions receiving applications from eligible students
for loans to be received during such fiscal years. The distribution for each
of fiscal years 2011-12 and 2012-13 shall be proportional based on the amounts
applied for by eligible students at each institution, except that no more
than one hundred percent of such amounts shall be distributed. The eligible
institutions shall act as agents of the department in the distribution of
the funds for the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program to eligible students.

(4) Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 19;

Laws 2001, Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 79-8,136;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 8.
March 16, 2011
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.